Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.330

Assistance for parolees, work release, and discharged prisoners—Department may accept gifts and make expenditures.

The department of corrections may accept any devise, bequest, gift, grant, or contribution made for the purposes of RCW 9.95.310 through 9.95.370 and the secretary of corrections or his or her designee may make expenditures, or approve expenditures by local parole or probation officers, therefrom for the purposes of RCW 9.95.310 through 9.95.370 in accordance with the rules of the department of corrections.

[ 2011 c 336 s 341; 1981 c 136 s 46; 1971 ex.s. c 31 s 3; 1961 c 217 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.